test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ceve_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čeve: # 2B
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeve
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiäpáttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiäpáttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiäpáttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiäppáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: čevveen             #čiäpáttin
    čeve+N+Par: čevveed             #čiäpáttid
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiäpátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiäpáttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiäpáttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiäpáttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiäpáttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: čiäpáttijguin
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiäpáttijttáá

    
    
